ani_advadj.lexd
#-----------ADVERBS AND ADJECTIVES-----------

PATTERN AdverbAdjective
NoClasses > Vowels [<pl>:л]
ClassInfix > Vowels [<pl>:л]
ClassPrefix > Vowels [<pl>:л]

PATTERN NoClasses
AdjNoClassesLex [<adj>:]
AdvNoClassesLex [<adv>:]

PATTERN ClassPrefix
Class[1] AdjStem[1] [<adj>:]
Class[2] AdjStem[2] [<adj>:]
Class[3] AdjStem[3] [<adj>:]
Class[4] AdjStem[4] [<adj>:]
Class[1] AdvStem[1] [<adv>:]
Class[2] AdvStem[2] [<adv>:]
Class[3] AdvStem[3] [<adv>:]
Class[4] AdvStem[4] [<adv>:]

PATTERN ClassInfix
AdjInStem(1) Class AdjInStem(2) [<adj>:]

LEXICON Class
<cl>:в[1]
<cl>:й[2]
<cl>:б[3]
<cl>:р[4]

LEXICON Vowels
а
о
е
и
у
